src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VSUF-INF_ED
+Err/Orth-extra-q: DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh ;
 VSUF-INF_ED_NO_mOsh ;
LEXICON VSUF-INF_ED_NO_mOsh
+Inf:%>ed K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ep K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>veʹted K ;
+Imprt+Pl1:%>ep K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>ed K ;
+Actio+Ess:%>em^RmVow%>en K ;
+Actio:%>em K ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAct+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>em  N_AANAR ;
+Der+Der/NomAct+Der+Der/nalla+Adv:%>em»nalla K ;
+Err/Orth+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;
+Err/Orth+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED
+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>am K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>am K ; !HERE or ONE LEXICON UP
 DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh ;
+Der+Der/oottyd+V:»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/oollyd+V:»õõll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Err/Orth+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;

LEXICON DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@»mõ^1VOW{ʹØ}š N_5Y_VS_VVZZ ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Err/Orth+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@»mu^1VOW{ʹØ}š N_5Y_VS_VVZZ ;

LEXICON DEVERBAL-NOUN_ummush
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>ummuš N_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Err/Orth+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>umu^1VOW{ʹØ}š N_5Y_VS_VVZZ ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Err/Orth+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>ummu^1VOW{ʹØ}š N_5Y_VS_VVZZ ;


LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED !!= * @CODE@ puätˈtaz
+Imprt+Pl3:%>az K ;
+Der+Der/jed+Der+Der/Caus+V:%>at TV_SHORRNED ;

!
LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>em K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>iǩ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-extra-q:%>iʹǩ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>ik K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>e K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>eš K ;
LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_AD
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>um K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>uk K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>u K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>uš K ;
+Der+Der/jed+Der+Der/Caus+V:%>ât TV_KHIORGGNED ;

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>em K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>iǩ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-extra-q:%>iʹǩ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>ik K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>e K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>eš K ;

LEXICON FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED !!= * @CODE@ (11) 
!! Vowel_raising, palatalization, Cons-grade-retension
 VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NOM-AG_ED ;


!
LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3_PL1_PL2_
!! VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD, VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD and VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED come here
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>im K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>in K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>iim K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>id K ;

!
LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD
 VSUF-I-POTKOND ;
+Pot+Sg3:%>âž   K ;
 VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3_PL1_PL2_ ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>ât K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
 VABESS ;
 GER_ ;
+Der+Der/Caus+V:»ât  TV_AALGXTED ;
+Der+Der/Caus+Der+Der/oottyd+V:»t»õõ{ʹØ}tt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/Caus+Der+Der/oollyd+V:»t»õõ{ʹØ}ll TV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NOM-AG_ÂD_NO_PL-NOM ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»âst VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/st+V:^Pen^Allegro»{ʼØ}st VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/InchL+V:^Pen^Allegro»{ʼØ}škuä{ʹØ}tt V_SHKUEAQTTED ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/stoollyd+V:^Pen^Allegro»{ʼØ}stõõ{ʹØ}ll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_SG4_yt_ERRORTH
+Err/Orth: IND_PRS_SG4_yt ;
LEXICON IND_PRS_SG4_yt
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>ât K ;

LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD
 VSUF-I-POTKOND ;
+Pot+Sg3:%>až   K ;
+Imprt+Sg3:%>as K ;
:%>a VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3_PL1_PL2_ ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>at K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;

+Imprt+Sg3:%>as K ;
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
 VABESS ;
 GER_ ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@ai NOM-AG_AD_NO_PL-NOM ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Err/Orth+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/st+V:^Pen^Allegro»{ʼØ}st VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/InchL+V:^Pen^Allegro»{ʼØ}škuä{ʹØ}tt V_SHKUEAQTTED ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/stoollyd+V:^Pen^Allegro»{ʼØ}stõõ{ʹØ}ll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;


LEXICON VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED
+Pot+Sg3:%>ež K ;
 POTENTIAL ;
 VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3_PL1_PL2_ ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NOM-AG_ED_NO_PL-NOM ;

LEXICON VABESS
+VAbess:%>{ʼØ}ǩâni K ;
+VAbess+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}kani K ;
+VAbess+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}ǩani K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>{ʼØ}kâni K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>{ʼØ}kâna K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>{ʼØ}ǩeânai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>{ʼØ}ǩenai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>{ʼØ}ǩeânnai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>{ʼØ}ǩânai K ;


LEXICON GER_
: DenominalAdjsCShort ; !!= * @CODE@ (Feist 2012: 200-201) +Der+Der/teqm
+Ger+Instr:%>eeʹl K ; !FIX-ME
+Err/Orth-no-q+Ger+Instr:%>eel K ; !FIX-ME
+Ger+Ess:%>een K ; !FIX-ME +Ger+Ess 
+Err/Orth-extra-q+Ger+Ess:%>eeʹn K ; !FIX-ME +Ger+Ess

+Ger+Loc:%>eeʹst K ; !FIX-ME +Ger+Loc
! CHECK-ME
+Ger+Loc+PxSg1:%>eeʹstan K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxSg2:%>eeʹstad K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxSg3:%>eeʹstes K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxPl1:%>eeʹsteen K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxPl2:%>eeʹsteed K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxPl3:%>eeʹsteez K ;


LEXICON VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED  !!= * @CODE@ (7)
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak K ;
 CONDITIONAL ;
+Imprt+Sg3:%>as K ;

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED !!= * @CODE@ (6)
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>et K ;
 VABESS ;
 GER_ ; 

+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;

+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»est VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/st+V:^Pen^Allegro»{ʼØ}st VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; !!= * @CODE@ no allegro


LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND
 POTENTIAL ;
 CONDITIONAL ;

LEXICON POTENTIAL
 +Pot+Sg1:%>{ʼØ}žem K	;
 +Pot+Sg2:%>{ʼØ}žiǩ K	;
 +Pot+Sg2+Err/Orth-extra-q:%>{ʼØ}žiʹǩ K	;
 +Pot+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>{ʼØ}žik K	;
 +Pot+Pl1:%>{ʼØ}žep K	; ! How are these related?
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pot+Pl1:%>{ʼØ}žim K	; ! Are there sub standards?
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pot+Pl1:%>{ʼØ}žin K	; !
 +Pot+Pl2:%>{ʼØ}žid K	;
 +Pot+Pl3:%>{ʼØ}že K	;
 +Pot+Sg4:%>{ʼØ}žet K ;
 +Pot+ConNeg:%>{ʼØ}že K ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL
 +Cond+Sg1:%>{ʼØ}čem K	;
 +Cond+Sg2:%>{ʼØ}čiǩ K	;
 +Cond+Sg2+Err/Orth-extra-q:%>{ʼØ}čiʹǩ K	;
 +Cond+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>{ʼØ}čik K	;
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cond+Sg2:%>{ʼØ}čeǩ K	;
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cond+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>{ʼØ}ček K	;
 +Cond+Sg3:%>{ʼØ}či K	;
 +Cond+Pl1:%>{ʼØ}čim K	; ! How are these related?
 +Cond+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}čep K	; ! Are there substandards? 
 +Cond+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}čin K	; !
 +Cond+Pl2:%>{ʼØ}čid K	;
 +Cond+Pl3:%>{ʼØ}če K	;
 +Cond+Sg4:%>{ʼØ}češ K ;
 +Cond+ConNeg:%>{ʼØ}če K ;


LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>u K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;
+Der+Der/jed+Der+Der/Caus+V:%>ât TV_KHIORGGNED ;
+Err/Orth: FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>u K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;
LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_AD
+Imprt+Pl3:%>az K ;
+Err/Orth: FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>u K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;

! Suffix series II

! Not written

! Other series
! - - - - - -

LEXICON VSUF-PRSPRC_AD
+Act+PrsPrc:ai K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:ai K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^CC2C%>ai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:ai K ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a{ʼØ}i NMN_PRSPRCA_VVKK-AI ;

LEXICON VSUF-PRSPRC_ED
+Act+PrsPrc:%>i K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>i K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^CC2C%>i K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>i K ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:%>{ʼØ}i NMN_PRSPRCÂ_VVCC-I ; !CHECKME 2016-04-22
